Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 12.1 The Towing Storage Act

39-12.1-1.
Declaration of purpose and policy.

The legislature hereby finds the following legislation to be in the public interest for these reasons:

WHEREAS, A tow truck in the hands of an incompetent operator is a dangerous instrumentality; and

WHEREAS, The public has an inherent right to ready access to the name, location, and telephone number of certificated towers; and

WHEREAS, The operation of a tow truck on the public highway with a vehicle in tow is a dangerous instrumentality exposing others on or about the highway to loss or damage, which must be covered by adequate insurance; and

WHEREAS, The motoring public has a right, when delegating to law enforcement the selection of an operator in the towing-storage business, to expect that the operator selected and responding will be competent; and

WHEREAS, The motoring public has a right when delegating to law enforcement the selection of an operator in the towing-storage business, to expect that the charges for the services to be rendered will be reasonable and compensatory, and that the operator is physically equipped in his or her business to function properly; and

WHEREAS, The towing and storage of a vehicle without the owner’s consent, as is the case in most police-instigated tows, requires certain procedures to assure the owner that rights of due process of law are not violated; and

WHEREAS, The owner or person in control of private property of real estate has a right to be free from trespass by vehicle on the private property; and to have any trespassing vehicle removed at the owner’s expense; and

WHEREAS, The police powers delegated by the legislature of the state include the power of the police, even without the owner’s consent, to have public ways cleared of conditions that, in the opinion of the officer, create a hazardous condition to the motoring public; to have removed abandoned, abandoned and of no value, and unattended vehicles; to have removed and/or relocated vehicles in violation of parking ordinances; and to have removed any vehicle under control of any person arrested for any criminal offense; and

WHEREAS, The process of selection of the operator of a towing-storage business for police work is unique in that law enforcement, though having the legal duty to order the work, has no legal duty to pay costs and charges connected therewith, the same being the duty of the vehicle owner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 328, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 14.

39-12.1-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following words shall have the meaning as set forth in this section.

“Abandoned vehicle” means (i) A vehicle that is inoperable and more than eight (8) years old and is left unattended on public property for more than forty-eight (48) hours; or (ii) A vehicle that has remained illegally on public property for a period of more than three (3) days; or (iii) A vehicle that has remained on private property without the consent of the owner or person in control of the property for more than three (3) days.

“Abandoned vehicle of no value” means (i) a motor vehicle that is inoperable and more than ten (10) years old and is left unattended on public property for more than forty-eight (48) hours; or (ii) A vehicle that has remained illegally on public property for a period of more than three (3) days; or (iii) A vehicle that has remained on private property without the consent of the owner or person in control of the property for more than three (3) days, and meets the following criteria:

The vehicle has no evidence of current registration in or upon the vehicle; and

The vehicle has a fair market value of five hundred dollars ($500) or less; and

The vehicle does not have a valid inspection sticker.

“Certificated tower” means a carrier possessing a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the public utilities administrator for the purpose of transporting vehicles by tow-away method.

“Legal owner” means the person who has obtained ownership of a vehicle by any legal means but has not caused the vehicle to be registered with the division of motor vehicles.

“Police department” means the police department of a city or town or the Rhode Island state department.

“Possessory lien” means the right to retain possession of a vehicle and motor vehicle registration plates against all claims of the owner and/or security lien or until all charges are paid for recovery, towing, storage in accordance with the certificated tower’s tariff.

“Private trespass” means the unattended presence of a vehicle on private property without the consent of the owner or person in control thereof.

“Registered owner” means the person recorded in the division of motor vehicles as being the one to whom the registration of the vehicle was issued.

“Tow truck” means any motor vehicle designed and/or ordinarily used for the purpose of towing or removing vehicles or assisting disabled motor vehicles.

“Unattended vehicle” means any vehicle other than an “abandoned vehicle” or “abandoned vehicle of no value” that meets the following criteria:

Left unoccupied in a place or for a time period prohibited by law or municipal ordinance or so as to cause traffic congestion or hazard; or

From which the operator or owner thereof has been removed by any member of a police department in the performance of his or her official duties; or

Left on public or private property without the consent of the owner or person in control thereof, or one having the exclusive right to the use thereof.

“Vehicle” means any motor vehicle as defined in §

39-12-2

.

“Vehicle survey report” means a report printed in the form provided in §

31-42-1(f)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 328, § 1.

39-12.1-3.
Removal of abandoned, abandoned and of no value, and unattended vehicles.

Any member of any police department or the owner or person in control of private property may order the removal of any abandoned or unattended vehicle, or any member of any police department, upon completion of a vehicle survey report, as defined in this chapter, may order the removal of any abandoned vehicle of no value by a certificated tower and may instruct the certificated tower to remove the vehicle to its own place of storage.

The last registered owner and/or the legal owner, or the person who left a vehicle in a position so that the vehicle becomes abandoned, abandoned and of no value, or unattended shall be liable for all reasonable costs of recovery, towing, and storage in accordance with the certificated tower’s tariff.

Any member of a police department observing a vehicle on or near a public way that appears to be abandoned, abandoned and of no value, or unattended shall tag the vehicle by affixing securely to the vehicle a colored form or by using an easily observable sticker. The tag or sticker shall show:

The date and time of tagging, and the name and telephone number of the police department;

That the vehicle will be removed pursuant to this chapter unless the vehicle is removed after forty-eight (48) hours; provided, however, the police officer may order the immediate removal of the vehicle without prior tagging as provided in this section if it is parked illegally, causes traffic congestion or hazard, or when the operator is not allowed to continue to operate the vehicle after having been detained for operating in violation of the law.

No person in possession of a vehicle that, in the opinion of the police officer in charge of the scene, needs to be removed to another location, shall be denied the right to have any certificated tower of his or her choice attend to the removal; provided, however, that allowing the choice of certificated tower does not cause a continuation of traffic congestion or of a hazardous condition on the highway that the police officer is able to eliminate by other means. When the hazardous condition has been eliminated, the person’s choice shall be employed to remove the vehicle to the place selected by the person in possession.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 328, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 114.

39-12.1-4.
Notice and processing of abandoned and unclaimed motor vehicles by certificated tower.

A certificated tower removing an abandoned or unattended vehicle shall notify within two (2) hours thereof, the police department of the city or town from which the vehicle is towed, and shall provide:

The year, make, model, and serial number of the vehicle;

The name, address, and telephone number of the certificated tower; and

The street address or location from which the vehicle was towed.

A certificated tower removing an abandoned or unattended vehicle shall notify within fourteen (14) days thereof, by registered mail, return receipt requested, the last-known registered owner of the vehicle and all lienholders of record at the address shown in the records of the appropriate registry in the state in which the vehicle is registered that the vehicle has been taken into custody. The notice shall be substantially in the form provided in §

39-12.1-13

and shall describe:

The year, make, model, and serial number of the vehicle;

The name, address, and telephone number of the certificated tower;

That the vehicle is in the possession of that certificated tower;

That recovery, towing, and storage charges are accruing as a legal liability of the registered and/or legal owner;

That the certificated tower claims a possessory lien for all recovery, towing, and storage charges;

That the registered and/or legal owner may retake possession at any time during business hours by appearing, proving ownership, and paying all charges due the certificated tower pursuant to its published tariff;

That should the registered and/or legal owner consider that the original taking was improper or not legally justified, he or she has a right to file an administrative complaint pursuant to chapter 12 of this title to contest the original taking;

That if no claim is filed and the vehicle is not claimed and possession retaken or arranged for within thirty (30) days of the mailing of the notice, the lien will be foreclosed and the vehicle will be sold at public auction;

That the proceeds of the sale shall be first applied to recovery, towing, and storage charges with any excess proceeds being deposited as provided in accordance with §

39-12.1-9(d)(3)

;

That any recovery, towing, and storage charges in excess of the sale proceeds shall remain as a civil obligation of the registered and/or legal owner.

If the identity of the last registered owner cannot be determined from the records of the appropriate registry in the state in which the vehicle is registered, or if the registration contains no address for the ownership, or if it is impossible to determine with reasonable certainty the identity and addresses of all lienholders, notice by one publication in one newspaper of general circulation in the area where the vehicle was abandoned or left unattended shall be sufficient to meet all requirements of notice pursuant to this chapter. A notice by publication may contain multiple listings of abandoned or unattended vehicles. Any notice by publication shall be within the time requirements prescribed for notice by registered mail and shall have the same contents required for a notice by registered mail.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 328, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 114; P.L. 2004, ch. 294, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 489, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 6.

39-12.1-5.
Special procedure regarding certain abandoned vehicles.

If an abandoned, abandoned and of no value, or unattended vehicle, as defined in §

39-12.1-2

, is at least ten (10) years old or less than ten (10) years old and has an altered vehicle identification number; has not been registered within one year; has no established fair market value; and would not pass a safety inspection pursuant to chapter 38 of title 31, a certificated tower shall not be required to comply with the provisions of §

39-12.1-4

.

If a police department takes possession or orders the removal of a vehicle that meets the requirements of this section, the police department shall request that the state police conduct a computer search to determine if the vehicle is a stolen vehicle. The police department shall remove the vehicle identification number from the vehicle and shall maintain a record of all numbers removed from vehicles for a period of two (2) years.

A police department that complies with the provisions of this section may dispose of the vehicle in accordance with the provisions of §

39-12.1-9

five (5) days after the removal of the vehicle identification number.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 328, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 114; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 6.

39-12.1-6.
Possessory lien.

Any certificated tower coming into possession of a vehicle in any lawful manner shall have a possessory lien on the vehicle and registration plates, so long as it retains possession, and if it has conformed in full with the provisions of §§

39-12.1-4

and

39-12.1-8

. The lien shall be in an amount in accordance with its published tariff.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 328, § 1.

39-12.1-7.
Thirty (30) day waiting period.

Any certificated tower in possession of any vehicle subject to a possessory lien for a period in excess of thirty (30) consecutive days, and not having been compensated in accordance with its published tariff, is authorized to give notice and proceed to foreclosure as provided in §§

39-12.1-8

and

39-12.1-9

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 328, § 1.

39-12.1-8.
Notice prior to enforcement of possessory lien.

Prior to enforcement of its possessory lien as provided in §

39-12.1-9

, the certificated tower shall give notice by registered mail, return receipt requested, to the last-known registered owner and all known lienholders of record, at the address shown on the records of the appropriate registry, in the state of which the vehicle is registered, substantially in the form provided in §

39-12.1-14

, stating:

That no complaint having been filed and that the vehicle has not been claimed or possession retaken or arranged for within thirty (30) days of the notice given pursuant to §

39-12.1-4

;

That the certificated tower claims a possessory lien for all recovery, towing, and storage charges;

That the registered and/or legal owner may retake possession at any time during business hours by appearing, proving ownership, and paying all charges due the certificated tower pursuant to its published tariff;

That if the vehicle is not claimed and possession retaken, or arranged for, within ten (10) days of the mailing of the notice, the lien will be foreclosed and the vehicle will be sold at public auction;

The date, time, and place at which the public auction shall occur; and

That any charges in excess of the sale proceeds shall remain as a civil obligation of the owner.

If the identity of the last-known registered owner and/or the lienholders cannot be determined by a request to the appropriate registry in the state in which the vehicle is registered, notice by the certificated tower pursuant to §

39-12.1-4(b)

shall be sufficient notice prior to foreclosure of the possessory lien; provided, however, in such instance, no such foreclosure shall occur prior to sixty (60) days after the date of notice by the certificated tower.

During the sixty-day (60) period described in subsection (b) of this section, provided for in §

39-12.1-9(a)

, should the last registered and/or legal owner receive actual notice containing the items referred to in subsection (a) of this section, the certificated tower may proceed with lien foreclosure procedures set forth in this chapter.

Notwithstanding the fact that the last-registered owner of the vehicle proves that the vehicle has been sold to another owner but that the registration has not been transferred, the last-registered owner shall remain primarily liable to the certificated tower for all charges incurred for towing and storage charges less whatever proceeds are realized at the foreclosure sale.

In the event it shall be determined that failure to locate the last-registered and/or legal owner and/or lienholders was caused by any misinformation furnished by any agency of government, or because of lack of information that a government agency has the legal duty to provide, and providing that the certificated tower shall have exercised its best efforts to locate the last registered and/or legal owner and/or lienholders, the certificated tower shall be absolved of any civil duty to the lawful owner of the vehicle, and shall have complete defense against any criminal charges growing out of the disposal of the vehicle as provided in this section. In this regard, a certificated tower shall rely on the performance of law enforcement to comply with statutes dealing with the reporting of vehicles reported stolen. In addition, proof by the certificated tower of having made inquiry of the appropriate registry in the state in which the vehicle is registered in the manner required by the registry shall constitute best efforts.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 328, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 114; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 6.

39-12.1-9.
Foreclosure of lien.

Any vehicle subject to a possessory lien as provided for in §

39-12.1-6

, not redeemed by its owner within a period of ten (10) days from the date of the notice sent in conformity with §

39-12.1-8(a)

or sixty (60) days from the date of notice sent in conformity with §§

39-12.1-4

and

39-12.1-8(b)

, may be sold at a nonjudicial public auction.

In addition to the notice required pursuant to §§

39-12.1-8(a)

or

39-12.1-4

and

39-12.1-8(b)

, notice of the sale shall be:

Published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the address of the registered owner is located or in which the business of the certificated tower is located if the identity of the last registered owner cannot be determined at least once at least ten (10) days prior to the sale; and

Posted in the certificated tower’s place of business; and

Mailed by registered mail, return receipt requested, to the officer-in-charge of the police department or person who instigated the initial tow.

The purchaser of a vehicle sold at auction pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall take title to the vehicle free and clear of all liens and claims of ownership. The certificated tower selling the vehicle shall give the purchaser a sales receipt, bill of sale, and affidavit of compliance with the provisions of this chapter. Upon presentation of the sales receipt, bill of sale, and affidavit of compliance to the division of motor vehicles, the division shall: (1) Cause any prior title and/or registration to the vehicle to be canceled and revoked; and (2) Shall issue to the purchaser a new title and registration.

The proceeds from the foreclosure sale shall be distributed to the extent available as follows:

First, to pay for the expenses of the auction;

Second, to pay the certificated tower for the costs of recovery, of towing, and storage of the vehicle in accordance with its published tariff; and

Any remainder from the proceeds of sale shall be deposited with the general treasurer of the state to be held in a restricted account for the registered or legal owner or entitled lienholder. All sums held by the public utilities commission for a period of three (3) or more years for which no claim has been made by the registered and/or legal owner or lienholder shall be presumed abandoned and shall revert to the general fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 328, § 1.

39-12.1-10.
Special procedures regarding the disposal of abandoned vehicles of no value.

Notwithstanding any provision of the general laws to the contrary, a police department that orders the removal of or takes into custody an abandoned vehicle of no value shall hold the vehicle for a period of not less than ten (10) days. After the ten (10) days, the police department or its authorized representative shall remove the vehicle identification number from the vehicle and shall maintain a record of the number removed from the vehicle for a period of not less than one year. After the ten-day (10) period, the vehicle shall be demolished. A demolisher, who or that receives an abandoned vehicle of no value from a police department or certificated tower directed by the police to deliver the abandoned vehicle of no value, shall demolish the entire vehicle as received within fourteen (14) days of the receipt of the vehicle. Within seven (7) days after demolishing the vehicle, the demolisher shall provide the police department and the certificated tower that delivered the vehicle for demolition with a certificate attesting that the vehicle has been demolished in accordance with this section. The certificate shall be kept on file by the police department and the certificated tower for a period of one year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 328, § 1.

39-12.1-11.
Preexisting impoundments.

Any certificated tower having in its possession any vehicle for sixty (60) days or longer, of whatever value and regardless of how it came legally into possession thereof, is hereby presumed to have a valid possessory lien on the vehicle and may proceed to foreclosure after giving notice as provided in §§

39-12.1-4

and

39-12.1-8

of the lien.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 328, § 1.

39-12.1-12.
Private trespass towing.

The owner or person in control of any parcel of property may cause to be removed from the property vehicles trespassing upon the property without the consent of the owner or person in control of the property by retaining, in writing, a certificated tower to remove the trespassing vehicle and relocate the vehicle to its private impoundment lot; and this procedure may be undertaken and accomplished without the need to resort to the judicial process; provided, however, that the impoundment lot shall be within ten (10) miles of the point of removal; and provided further that the lot shall be open for business to release the vehicle the same hours it is open to receive the vehicle; and provided further that there shall be posted on the outside of the office of the lot the business hours.

All charges for towing, in accordance with the published tariff and storage shall be borne by the last-registered and/or legal owner of the vehicle for which charges the certificated tower shall have a possessory lien as set forth elsewhere in this chapter; provided, however, that should the last-registered and/or legal owner prove through judicial process that the vehicle was not in fact trespassing on the property of the owner or person in control, the charges shall be borne by the owner or person in control of the property who ordered the towing, removal, relocation, and storage. The last-registered and/or legal owner shall, however, as a prerequisite to procedure to recover the charges from the owner or person in control of the property, pay in full all charges assessed due the certificated tower in accordance with its published tariff.

A certificated tower shall remove vehicles from private property at the direction of the owner or person in control thereof only upon receiving the direction in writing, which writing and notice shall be kept in the records of the certificated tower and which writing shall be a complete defense to any civil and criminal charges resulting from removal of the vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 328, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 304, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 453, § 1.

39-12.1-13.
Form of notice.

TO: (LAST REGISTERED OWNER AND KNOWN LIENHOLDERS) You are hereby given notice that a (year, make, and model of vehicle) serial number , is being stored at (name, address and telephone number of storage facility). The vehicle is in the possession of (name, address and telephone number of certificated tower), having been towed at the direction of (name of police department or person ordering tow) because (reason for tow). You are given notice that recovery, towing, and storage charges, for which the registered and/or legal owner is liable, are accruing and that (tower's name, address and telephone number) has claimed a possessory lien, pursuant to , for the charges. You may take possession of the vehicle at any time during regular business hours by appearing with a police release, if required, and payment of all charges accrued to date of retaking. §

39-12.1-6

If you claim that the original towing was improper or not legally justified you may contest the towing by filing a complaint within ten (10) days from the date of this notice with the public utilities commission, provided that security in an amount and form satisfactory to the public utilities commission is posted with the filing of the complaint. You are further given notice that if you fail to file a complaint or fail to retake possession of the vehicle, the vehicle will be sold at public auction and the proceeds of the sale will be first applied to recovery, towing, and storage charges with any excess to be deposited with the public utilities commission to be held in an account for the registered or legal owner or entitled lienholders as provided for in . §

39-12.1-9(d)(3)

You are further given notice that any recovery, towing and storage charges in excess of the sale proceeds shall remain as a civil obligation of the owner. (Name and address of certificated tower or attorney)

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 328, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 6.

39-12.1-14.
Form of foreclosure notice.

TO: (LAST REGISTERED OWNER AND KNOWN LIENHOLDER) You are hereby given notice that no complaint having been filed and the vehicle not having been claimed or possession retaken or arranged for in accordance with the notice given on (date of first notice) that recovery, towing, and storage charges for which the registered and/or legal owner is liable have and are accruing and the (tower's name, address, and telephone number) is claiming a possessory lien, pursuant to , for the charges. You may take possession of the vehicle at any time during regular business hours by appearing with a police release, if required, and payment of all charges accrued to date or retaking. §

39-12.1-6

You are further given notice that if you fail to retake possession of the vehicle, the vehicle will be sold at public auction at (time of sale) on (date of sale) at (address of location of sale). You are further given notice that the proceeds from the sale will be distributed as provided for in the first notice. (name and address of tower or attorney)

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 328, § 1.

39-12.1-15.
Enforcement and administration of chapter.

The public utilities administrator shall supervise, regulate, and enforce the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 328, § 1.